Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.070

Terms of office.

The judges of the superior court elected under the provisions of RCW 2.08.060 through 2.08.065 shall hold their offices for the term of four years from and after the second Monday in January next succeeding their election, and until their successors are elected and qualified.

[ 1927 c 135 s 2; RRS s 11045-2.]

NOTES:

Election, terms, etc., superior judges: State Constitution Art. 4 s 5.

Forfeiture of office for absence: State Constitution Art. 4 s 8.

Removal of judges: State Constitution Art. 4 s 9.